Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1968YH (3) 91 as/js H.F. 138 Section 1. SUPREME COURT ââ RULES OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE 1 REVISIONS. The supreme court shall revise rules of criminal 2 procedure 2.33(2) and 2.33(3) to provide that a defendant must 3 be brought to trial within one hundred twenty days after an 4 indictment is found or after a change in venue is granted by 5 the court. The revised rules of criminal procedure shall be 6 submitted for legislative council review no later than October 7 14, 2025. 8 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 9 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 10